Utah statutes.
32B-4-404.   Unlawful sale, offer for sale, or furnishing to intoxicated person.

(1)  A person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product to:

(a)  a person who is actually or apparently intoxicated; or

(b)  a person whom the person furnishing the alcoholic product knows or should know from the circumstances is actually or apparently intoxicated.

(2) (a)  A person who negligently or recklessly violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  A person who knowingly violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(3)  As used in Subsection (2)(a), "negligently" means with simple negligence.

